Ohio, session 136, SB28.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 131.02, 319.202, 715.013, 9
4303.26, 5703.052, 5703.053, 5703.19, 5703.263, 5703.50, 10
5703.70, 5703.77, 5703.90, 5725.26, and 5751.051 be amended and 11
sections 5747.081, 5755.01, 5755.011, 5755.02, 5755.03, 5755.04, 12
5755.05, 5755.051, 5755.052, 5755.06, 5755.07, and 5755.99 of 13
the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 14
Sec. 131.02. (A) Except as otherwise provided in section 15
4123.37, section 5703.061, and division (K) of section 4123.511 16
of the Revised Code, whenever any amount is payable to the 17
state, the officer, employee, or agent responsible for 18

S. B. No. 28 Page 2
As Introduced
administering the law under which the amount is payable shall 19
immediately proceed to collect the amount or cause the amount to 20
be collected and shall pay the amount into the state treasury or 21
into the appropriate custodial fund in the manner set forth 22
pursuant to section 113.08 of the Revised Code. Except as 23
otherwise provided in this division, if the amount is not paid 24
within forty-five days after payment is due, the officer, 25
employee, or agent shall certify the amount due to the attorney 26
general, in the form and manner prescribed by the attorney 27
general. In the case of an amount payable by a student enrolled 28
in a state institution of higher education, the amount shall be 29
certified within the later of forty-five days after the amount 30
is due or the tenth day after the beginning of the next academic 31
semester, quarter, or other session following the session for 32
which the payment is payable. The attorney general may assess 33
the collection cost to the amount certified in such manner and 34
amount as prescribed by the attorney general. If an amount 35
payable to a political subdivision is past due, the political 36
subdivision may, with the approval of the attorney general, 37
certify the amount to the attorney general pursuant to this 38
section. 39
For the purposes of this section, the attorney general and 40
the officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering 41
the law under which the amount is payable shall agree on the 42
time a payment is due, and that agreed upon time shall be one of 43
the following times: 44
(1) If a law, including an administrative rule, of this 45
state prescribes the time a payment is required to be made or 46
reported, when the payment is required by that law to be paid or 47
reported. 48

S. B. No. 28 Page 3
As Introduced
(2) If the payment is for services rendered, when the 49
rendering of the services is completed. 50
(3) If the payment is reimbursement for a loss, when the 51
loss is incurred. 52
(4) In the case of a fine or penalty for which a law or 53
administrative rule does not prescribe a time for payment, when 54
the fine or penalty is first assessed. 55
(5) If the payment arises from a legal finding, judgment, 56
or adjudication order, when the finding, judgment, or order is 57
rendered or issued. 58
(6) If the payment arises from an overpayment of money by 59
the state to another person, when the overpayment is discovered. 60
(7) The date on which the amount for which an individual 61
is personally liable under section 5735.35, section 5739.33, or 62
division (G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code is 63
determined. 64
(8) Upon proof of claim being filed in a bankruptcy case. 65
(9) Any other appropriate time determined by the attorney 66
general and the officer, employee, or agent responsible for 67
administering the law under which the amount is payable on the 68
basis of statutory requirements or ordinary business processes 69
of the agency, institution, or political subdivision to which 70
the payment is owed. 71
(B)(1) The attorney general shall give immediate notice by 72
mail or otherwise to the party indebted of the nature and amount 73
of the indebtedness. 74
(2) If the amount payable to this state arises from a tax 75
levied under Chapter 5733., 5739., 5741., 5747., or 5751., or 76

S. B. No. 28 Page 4
As Introduced
5755. of the Revised Code, the notice also shall specify all of 77
the following: 78
(a) The assessment or case number; 79
(b) The tax pursuant to which the assessment is made; 80
(c) The reason for the liability, including, if 81
applicable, that a penalty or interest is due; 82
(d) An explanation of how and when interest will be added 83
to the amount assessed; 84
(e) That the attorney general and tax commissioner, acting 85
together, have the authority, but are not required, to 86
compromise the claim and accept payment over a reasonable time, 87
if such actions are in the best interest of the state. 88
(C) The attorney general shall collect the claim or secure 89
a judgment and issue an execution for its collection. 90
(D) Each claim shall bear interest, from the day on which 91
the claim became due, at the rate per annum required by section 92
5703.47 of the Revised Code. 93
(E) The attorney general and the chief officer of the 94
agency reporting a claim, acting together, may do any of the 95
following if such action is in the best interests of the state: 96
(1) Compromise the claim; 97
(2) Extend for a reasonable period the time for payment of 98
the claim by agreeing to accept monthly or other periodic 99
payments. The agreement may require security for payment of the 100
claim. 101
(3) Add fees to recover the cost of processing checks or 102
other draft instruments returned for insufficient funds and the 103

S. B. No. 28 Page 5
As Introduced
cost of providing electronic payment options. 104
(F)(1) Except as provided in division (F)(2) of this 105
section, if the attorney general finds, after investigation, 106
that any claim due and owing to the state is uncollectible, the 107
attorney general, with the consent of the chief officer of the 108
agency reporting the claim, may do the following: 109
(a) Sell, convey, or otherwise transfer the claim to one 110
or more private entities for collection; 111
(b) Cancel the claim or cause it to be canceled. 112
(2) The attorney general shall cancel or cause to be 113
canceled an unsatisfied claim on the date that is forty years 114
after the date the claim is certified, unless the attorney 115
general has adopted a rule under division (F)(5) of this section 116
shortening this time frame with respect to a subset of claims. 117
(3) No initial action shall be commenced to collect any 118
tax payable to the state that is administered by the tax 119
commissioner, whether or not such tax is subject to division (B) 120
of this section, or any penalty, interest, or additional charge 121
on such tax, after the expiration of the period ending on the 122
later of the dates specified in divisions (F)(3)(a) and (b) of 123
this section, provided that such period shall be extended by the 124
period of any stay to such collection or by any other period to 125
which the parties mutually agree. If the initial action in aid 126
of execution is commenced before the later of the dates 127
specified in divisions (F)(3)(a) and (b) of this section, any 128
and all subsequent actions may be pursued in aid of execution of 129
judgment for as long as the debt exists. 130
(a) Seven years after the assessment of the tax, penalty, 131
interest, or additional charge is issued. 132

S. B. No. 28 Page 6
As Introduced
(b) Four years after the assessment of the tax, penalty, 133
interest, or additional charge becomes final. For the purposes 134
of division (F)(3)(b) of this section, the assessment becomes 135
final at the latest of the following: upon expiration of the 136
period to petition for reassessment, or if applicable, to appeal 137
a final determination of the commissioner or decision of the 138
board of tax appeals or a court, or, if applicable, upon 139
decision of the United States supreme court. 140
For the purposes of division (F)(3) of this section, an 141
initial action to collect a tax debt is commenced at the time 142
when a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making an 143
assessment final has been filed in the office of the clerk of 144
court of common pleas in the county in which the taxpayer 145
resides or has its principal place of business in this state, or 146
in the office of the clerk of court of common pleas of Franklin 147
county, as provided in section 5739.13, 5741.14, 5747.13, or 148
5751.09, or 5755.06 of the Revised Code or in any other 149
applicable law requiring such a filing. If an assessment has not 150
been issued and there is no time limitation on the issuance of 151
an assessment under applicable law, an action to collect a tax 152
debt commences when the action is filed in the courts of this 153
state to collect the liability. 154
(4) If information contained in a claim that is sold, 155
conveyed, or transferred to a private entity pursuant to this 156
section is confidential pursuant to federal law or a section of 157
the Revised Code that implements a federal law governing 158
confidentiality, such information remains subject to that law 159
during and following the sale, conveyance, or transfer. 160
(5) The attorney general may adopt rules to aid in the 161
implementation of this section. 162

S. B. No. 28 Page 7
As Introduced
Sec. 319.202. (A) Before the county auditor indorses any 163
real property conveyance or manufactured or mobile home 164
conveyance presented to the auditor pursuant to section 319.20 165
of the Revised Code or registers any manufactured or mobile home 166
conveyance pursuant to section 4503.061 of the Revised Code, the 167
grantee or the grantee's representative shall submit, either 168
electronically or three written copies of, a statement, in the 169
form prescribed by the tax commissioner, and other information 170
as the county auditor may require, declaring the value of real 171
property or manufactured or mobile home conveyed, except that 172
when the transfer is exempt under division (G)(3) of section 173
319.54 of the Revised Code only a statement of the reason for 174
the exemption shall be required. Each statement submitted under 175
this section shall contain the information required under 176
divisions (A)(A)(1) and (B)(2) of this section. If a taxable 177
house is conveyed to a pass-through entity, the statement 178
submitted under this section shall include the name, address, 179
telephone number, and electronic mail address of the entity and 180
an owner, member, manager, officer, partner, or associate, as 181
applicable, of the entity. 182
(A)(1) Each statement submitted under this section shall 183
either: 184
(1)(a) Contain an affirmation by the grantee that the 185
grantor has been asked by the grantee or the grantee's 186
representative whether to the best of the grantor's knowledge 187
either the preceding or the current year's taxes on the real 188
property or the current or following year's taxes on the 189
manufactured or mobile home conveyed will be reduced under 190
division (A) of section 323.152 or under section 4503.065 of the 191
Revised Code and that the grantor indicated that to the best of 192
the grantor's knowledge the taxes will not be so reduced; or 193

S. B. No. 28 Page 8
As Introduced
(2)(b) Be accompanied by a sworn or affirmed instrument 194
stating: 195
(a)(i) To the best of the grantor's knowledge the real 196
property or the manufactured or mobile home that is the subject 197
of the conveyance is eligible for and will receive a reduction 198
in taxes for or payable in the current year under division (A) 199
of section 323.152 or under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code 200
and that the reduction or reductions will be reflected in the 201
grantee's taxes; 202
(b)(ii) The estimated amount of such reductions that will 203
be reflected in the grantee's taxes; 204
(c)(iii) That the grantor and the grantee have considered 205
and accounted for the total estimated amount of such reductions 206
to the satisfaction of both the grantee and the grantor. The 207
auditor shall indorse the instrument, return it to the grantee 208
or the grantee's representative, and provide a copy of the 209
indorsed instrument to the grantor or the grantor's 210
representative. 211
(B)(2) Each statement submitted under this section shall 212
either: 213
(1) (a) Contain an affirmation by the grantee that the 214
grantor has been asked by the grantee or the grantee's 215
representative whether to the best of the grantor's knowledge 216
the real property conveyed qualified for the current 217
agricultural use valuation under section 5713.30 of the Revised 218
Code either for the preceding or the current year and that the 219
grantor indicated that to the best of the grantor's knowledge 220
the property conveyed was not so qualified; or 221
(2)(b) Be accompanied by a sworn or affirmed instrument 222

S. B. No. 28 Page 9
As Introduced
stating: 223
(a)(i) To the best of the grantor's knowledge the real 224
property conveyed was qualified for the current agricultural use 225
valuation under section 5713.30 of the Revised Code either for 226
the preceding or the current year; 227
(b)(ii) To the extent that the property will not continue 228
to qualify for the current agricultural use valuation either for 229
the current or the succeeding year, that the property will be 230
subject to a recoupment charge equal to the tax savings in 231
accordance with section 5713.34 of the Revised Code; 232
(c)(iii) That the grantor and the grantee have considered 233
and accounted for the total estimated amount of such recoupment, 234
if any, to the satisfaction of both the grantee and the grantor. 235
The auditor shall indorse the instrument, forward it to the 236
grantee or the grantee's representative, and provide a copy of 237
the indorsed instrument to the grantor or the grantor's 238
representative. 239
(B) Within thirty days after the qualifying transfer of an 240
ownership interest in a pass-through entity, the transferor of 241
the ownership interest shall submit to the county auditor of 242
each county in which a taxable house owned by the entity is 243
located a statement that includes both of the following: 244
(1) The name, address, telephone number, and electronic 245
mail address of the entity and an owner, member, manager, 246
officer, partner, or associate, as applicable, of the entity 247
being transferred; 248
(2) The address and parcel identification number of the 249
taxable house or houses owned directly or indirectly by the 250
entity being transferred. 251

S. B. No. 28 Page 10
As Introduced
(C) The grantor shall pay the fee required by division (G) 252
(3) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code; and, in the event the 253
board of county commissioners of the county has levied a real 254
property or a manufactured home transfer tax pursuant to Chapter 255
322. of the Revised Code, the amount required by the real 256
property or manufactured home transfer tax so levied. If the 257
conveyance is exempt from the fee provided for in division (G) 258
(3) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code and the tax, if any, 259
levied pursuant to Chapter 322. of the Revised Code, the reason 260
for such exemption shall be shown on the statement. "Value" 261
means, in the case of any deed or certificate of title not a 262
gift in whole or part, the amount of the full consideration 263
therefor, paid or to be paid for the real estate or manufactured 264
or mobile home described in the deed or title, including the 265
amount of any mortgage or vendor's lien thereon. If property 266
sold under a land installment contract is conveyed by the seller 267
under such contract to a third party and the contract has been 268
of record at least twelve months prior to the date of 269
conveyance, "value" means the unpaid balance owed to the seller 270
under the contract at the time of the conveyance, but the 271
statement shall set forth the amount paid under such contract 272
prior to the date of conveyance. In the case of a gift in whole 273
or part, "value" means the estimated price the real estate or 274
manufactured or mobile home described in the deed or certificate 275
of title would bring in the open market and under the then 276
existing and prevailing market conditions in a sale between a 277
willing seller and a willing buyer, both conversant with the 278
property and with prevailing general price levels. No person 279
shall willfully falsify the value of property conveyed. 280
(D) The auditor shall indorse each conveyance on its face 281
to indicate the amount of the conveyance fee and compliance with 282

S. B. No. 28 Page 11
As Introduced
this section and if the property is residential rental property 283
include a statement that the grantee shall file with the county 284
auditor the information required under division (A) or (C) of 285
section 5323.02 of the Revised Code. The auditor shall retain 286
the original copy of the statement of value, forward to the tax 287
commissioner one copy on which shall be noted the most recent 288
assessed value of the property, and furnish one copy to the 289
grantee or the grantee's representative. 290
(E) In order to achieve uniform administration and 291
collection of the transfer fee required by division (G)(3) of 292
section 319.54 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner shall 293
adopt and promulgate rules for the administration and 294
enforcement of the levy and collection of such fee. 295
(F) As used in this section, "residential : 296
(1) "Residential rental property" has the same meaning as 297
in section 5323.01 of the Revised Code. 298
(2) "Taxable house" has the same meaning as in section 299
5755.01 of the Revised Code. 300
(3) "Pass-through entity" has the same meaning as in 301
section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. 302
(4) "Qualifying transfer" means the transfer of more than 303
fifty per cent of the ownership interest in a pass-through 304
entity that, directly or indirectly, owns one or more taxable 305
houses. A "qualifying transfer" may occur in one transaction or 306
in a series of transactions. 307
Sec. 715.013. (A) Except as otherwise expressly authorized 308
by the Revised Code, no municipal corporation shall levy a tax 309
that is the same as or similar to a tax levied under Chapter 310
322., 3734., 3769., 4123., 4141., 4301., 4303., 4305., 4307., 311

S. B. No. 28 Page 12
As Introduced
4309., 5707., 5725., 5726., 5727., 5728., 5729., 5731., 5735., 312
5736., 5737., 5739., 5741., 5743., 5747., 5749., or 5751., or 313
5755. of the Revised Code. 314
(B) No municipal corporation may impose any tax, fee, 315
assessment, or other charge on auxiliary containers, on the 316
sale, use, or consumption of such containers, or on the basis of 317
receipts received from the sale of such containers. As used in 318
this division, "auxiliary container" has the same meaning as in 319
section 3767.32 of the Revised Code. 320
(C) This section does not prohibit a municipal corporation 321
from levying an income tax or withholding tax in accordance with 322
Chapter 718. of the Revised Code, or a tax on any of the 323
following: 324
(1) Amounts received for admission to any place; 325
(2) The income of an electric company or combined company, 326
as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code; 327
(3) On and after January 1, 2004, the income of a 328
telephone company, as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised 329
Code. 330
Sec. 4303.26. (A) Applications for regular permits 331
authorized by sections 4303.02 to 4303.23 of the Revised Code 332
may be filed with the division of liquor control. No permit 333
shall be issued by the division until fifteen days after the 334
application for it is filed. An applicant for the issuance of a 335
new permit shall pay a processing fee of one hundred dollars 336
when filing application for the permit, if the permit is then 337
available, or shall pay the processing fee when a permit becomes 338
available, if it is not available when the applicant initially 339
files the application. When an application for a new class C or 340

S. B. No. 28 Page 13
As Introduced
D permit is filed, when class C or D permits become available, 341
or when an application for transfer of ownership of a class C or 342
D permit or transfer of a location of a class C or D permit is 343
filed, no permit shall be issued, nor shall the location or the 344
ownership of a permit be transferred, by the division until the 345
division notifies the legislative authority of the municipal 346
corporation if the business or event is or is to be located 347
within the corporate limits of a municipal corporation, or the 348
clerk of the board of county commissioners and the fiscal 349
officer of the board of township trustees in the county in which 350
the business or event is or is to be conducted if the business 351
is or is to be located outside the corporate limits of a 352
municipal corporation, and an opportunity is provided officials 353
or employees of the municipal corporation or county and 354
township, who shall be designated by the legislative authority 355
or the board of county commissioners or board of township 356
trustees, for a complete hearing upon the advisability of the 357
issuance, transfer of ownership, or transfer of location of the 358
permit. In this hearing, no objection to the issuance, transfer 359
of ownership, or transfer of location of the permit shall be 360
based upon noncompliance of the proposed permit premises with 361
local zoning regulations which prohibit the sale of beer or 362
intoxicating liquor, in an area zoned for commercial or 363
industrial uses, for a permit premises that would otherwise 364
qualify for a proper permit issued by the division. 365
When the division sends notice to the legislative or 366
executive authority of the political subdivision, as required by 367
this section, the division shall also so notify, by certified 368
mail, return receipt requested, or by personal service, the 369
chief peace officer of the political subdivision. Upon the 370
request of the chief peace officer, the division shall send the 371

S. B. No. 28 Page 14
As Introduced
chief peace officer a copy of the application for the issuance 372
or the transfer of ownership or location of the permit and all 373
other documents or materials filed by the applicant or 374
applicants in relation to the application. The chief peace 375
officer may appear and testify, either in person or through a 376
representative, at any hearing held on the advisability of the 377
issuance, transfer of ownership, or transfer of location of the 378
permit. The hearing shall be held in the central office of the 379
division, except that upon written request of the legislative 380
authority of the municipal corporation or the board of county 381
commissioners or board of township trustees, the hearing shall 382
be held in the county seat of the county where the applicant's 383
business is or is to be conducted. 384
If the business or event specified in an application for 385
the issuance, transfer of ownership, or transfer of location of 386
any regular permit authorized by sections 4303.02 to 4303.23 of 387
the Revised Code, except for an F-2 permit, is, or is to be 388
operated, within five hundred feet from the boundaries of a 389
parcel of real estate having situated on it a school, church, 390
library, public playground, or township park, no permit shall be 391
issued, nor shall the location or the ownership of a permit be 392
transferred, by the division until written notice of the filing 393
of the application with the division is served, by certified 394
mail, return receipt requested, or by personal service, upon the 395
authorities in control of the school, church, library, public 396
playground, or township park and an opportunity is provided them 397
for a complete hearing upon the advisability of the issuance, 398
transfer of ownership, or transfer of location of the permit. In 399
this hearing, no objection to the issuance, transfer of 400
ownership, or transfer of location of the permit shall be based 401
upon the noncompliance of the proposed permit premises with 402

S. B. No. 28 Page 15
As Introduced
local zoning regulations which prohibit the sale of beer or 403
intoxicating liquor, in an area zoned for commercial or 404
industrial uses, for a permit premises that would otherwise 405
qualify for a proper permit issued by the division. Upon the 406
written request of any of these authorities, the hearing shall 407
be held in the county seat of the county where the applicant's 408
business is or is to be conducted. 409
A request for any hearing authorized by this section shall 410
be made no later than thirty days from the time of notification 411
by the division. This thirty-day period begins on the date the 412
division mails notice to the legislative authority or the date 413
on which the division mails notice to or, by personal service, 414
serves notice upon, the institution. The division shall conduct 415
a hearing if the request for the hearing is postmarked by the 416
deadline date. The division may allow, upon cause shown by the 417
requesting legislative authority or board, an extension of 418
thirty additional days for the legislative authority of the 419
municipal corporation, board of township trustees of the 420
township, or board of county commissioners of the county in 421
which a permit premises is or is to be located to object to the 422
issuance, transfer of ownership, or transfer of location of a 423
permit. The request for the extension shall be made by the 424
legislative authority or board to the division no later than 425
thirty days after the time of notification by the division. 426
(B) When an application for transfer of ownership of a 427
permit is filed with the division, the division shall give 428
notice of the application to the tax commissioner. Within twenty 429
days after receiving this notification, the commissioner shall 430
notify the division of liquor control and the proposed 431
transferee of the permit if the permit holder owes to this state 432
any delinquent horse-racing taxes, alcoholic beverage taxes, 433

S. B. No. 28 Page 16
As Introduced
motor fuel taxes, petroleum activity taxes, sales or use taxes, 434
cigarette taxes, other tobacco product taxes, income taxes 435
withheld from employee compensation, commercial activity taxes, 436
gross casino revenue taxes, housing market impact taxes, or 437
gross receipts taxes levied pursuant to section 5739.101 of the 438
Revised Code, or has failed to file any corresponding returns or 439
submit any information required by the commissioner, as required 440
for such taxes, to the extent that any delinquent payment or 441
return, or any failure to submit information, is known to the 442
department of taxation at the time of the application. The 443
division shall not transfer ownership of the permit until 444
payments known to be delinquent are resolved, returns known to 445
be delinquent are filed, and any information required by the 446
commissioner has been provided. As used in this division, 447
"resolved" means that the delinquent payment has been paid in 448
full or an amount sufficient to satisfy the delinquent payment 449
is in escrow for the benefit of the state. The commissioner 450
shall notify the division of the resolution. After the division 451
has received the notification from the commissioner, the 452
division may proceed to transfer ownership of the permit. 453
Nothing in this division shall be construed to affect or limit 454
the responsibilities or liabilities of the transferor or the 455
transferee imposed by Chapter 3769., 4301., 4303., 4305., 5735., 456
5736., 5739., 5741., 5743., 5747., 5751., or 5753., or 5755. of 457
the Revised Code. 458
(C) No F or F-2 permit shall be issued for an event until 459
the applicant has, by means of a form that the division shall 460
provide to the applicant, notified the chief peace officer of 461
the political subdivision in which the event will be conducted 462
of the date, time, place, and duration of the event. 463
(D) The division of liquor control shall notify an 464

S. B. No. 28 Page 17
As Introduced
applicant for a permit authorized by sections 4303.02 to 4303.23 465
of the Revised Code of an action pending or judgment entered 466
against a liquor permit premises, of which the division has 467
knowledge, pursuant to section 3767.03 or 3767.05 of the Revised 468
Code if the applicant is applying for a permit at the location 469
of the premises that is the subject of the action under section 470
3767.03 or judgment under section 3767.05 of the Revised Code. 471
Sec. 5703.052. (A) There is hereby created in the state 472
treasury the tax refund fund, from which refunds shall be paid 473
for amounts illegally or erroneously assessed or collected, or 474
for any other reason overpaid, with respect to taxes levied by 475
Chapter 4301., 4305., 5726., 5728., 5729., 5731., 5733., 5735., 476
5736., 5739., 5741., 5743., 5747., 5748., 5749., 5751., or 477
5753., or 5755. and sections 3737.71, 3905.35, 3905.36, 4303.33, 478
5707.03, 5725.18, 5727.28, 5727.38, 5727.81, and 5727.811 of the 479
Revised Code. Refunds for fees levied under sections 3734.90 to 480
3734.9014 of the Revised Code, wireless 9-1-1 charges imposed 481
under section 128.40 of the Revised Code, next generation 9-1-1 482
access fees imposed under sections 128.41 and 128.42 of the 483
Revised Code, or any penalties assessed with respect to such 484
fees or charges, that are illegally or erroneously assessed or 485
collected, or for any other reason overpaid, also shall be paid 486
from the fund. Refunds for amounts illegally or erroneously 487
assessed or collected by the tax commissioner, or for any other 488
reason overpaid, that are due under section 1509.50 of the 489
Revised Code shall be paid from the fund. Refunds for amounts 490
illegally or erroneously assessed or collected by the 491
commissioner, or for any other reason overpaid to the 492
commissioner, under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised 493
Code shall be paid from the fund. However, refunds for amounts 494
illegally or erroneously assessed or collected by the 495

S. B. No. 28 Page 18
As Introduced
commissioner, or for any other reason overpaid to the 496
commissioner, with respect to taxes levied under section 497
5739.101 of the Revised Code shall not be paid from the tax 498
refund fund, but shall be paid as provided in section 5739.104 499
of the Revised Code. 500
(B)(1) Upon certification by the tax commissioner to the 501
treasurer of state of a tax refund, a wireless 9-1-1 charge 502
refund, a next generation 9-1-1 access fee refund, or another 503
amount refunded, or by the superintendent of insurance of a 504
domestic or foreign insurance tax refund, the treasurer of state 505
shall place the amount certified to the credit of the fund. The 506
certified amount transferred shall be derived from the receipts 507
of the same tax, fee, wireless 9-1-1 charge, next generation 9- 508
1-1 access fee, or other amount from which the refund arose. 509
(2) When a refund is for a tax, fee, wireless 9-1-1 510
charge, next generation 9-1-1 access fee, or other amount that 511
is not levied by the state or that was illegally or erroneously 512
distributed to a taxing jurisdiction, the tax commissioner shall 513
recover the amount of that refund from the next distribution of 514
that tax, fee, wireless 9-1-1 charge, next generation 9-1-1 515
access fee, or other amount that otherwise would be made to the 516
taxing jurisdiction. If the amount to be recovered would exceed 517
twenty-five per cent of the next distribution of that tax, fee, 518
wireless 9-1-1 charge, next generation 9-1-1 access fee, or 519
other amount, the commissioner may spread the recovery over more 520
than one future distribution, taking into account the amount to 521
be recovered and the amount of the anticipated future 522
distributions. In no event may the commissioner spread the 523
recovery over a period to exceed thirty-six months. 524
Sec. 5703.053. As used in this section, "postal service" 525

S. B. No. 28 Page 19
As Introduced
means the United States postal service. 526
An application to the tax commissioner for a tax refund 527
under section 4307.05, 4307.07, 718.91, 5726.30, 5727.28, 528
5727.91, 5728.061, 5735.122, 5735.13, 5735.14, 5735.141, 529
5735.142, 5736.08, 5739.07, 5741.10, 5743.05, 5743.53, 5745.11, 530
5749.08, or 5751.08, or 5755.05 of the Revised Code or division 531
(B) of section 5703.05 of the Revised Code, or a fee refunded 532
under section 3734.905 of the Revised Code, that is received 533
after the last day for filing under such section shall be 534
considered to have been filed in a timely manner if: 535
(A) The application is delivered by the postal service and 536
the earliest postal service postmark on the cover in which the 537
application is enclosed is not later than the last day for 538
filing the application; 539
(B) The application is delivered by the postal service, 540
the only postmark on the cover in which the application is 541
enclosed was affixed by a private postal meter, the date of that 542
postmark is not later than the last day for filing the 543
application, and the application is received within seven days 544
of such last day; or 545
(C) The application is delivered by the postal service, no 546
postmark date was affixed to the cover in which the application 547
is enclosed or the date of the postmark so affixed is not 548
legible, and the application is received within seven days of 549
the last day for making the application. 550
Sec. 5703.19. (A) To carry out the purposes of the laws 551
that the tax commissioner is required to administer, the 552
commissioner or any person employed by the commissioner for that 553
purpose, upon demand, may inspect books, accounts, records, and 554

S. B. No. 28 Page 20
As Introduced
memoranda of any person or public utility subject to those laws, 555
and may examine under oath any officer, agent, or employee of 556
that person or public utility. Any person other than the 557
commissioner who makes a demand pursuant to this section shall 558
produce the person's authority to make the inspection. 559
(B) If a person or public utility receives at least ten 560
days' written notice of a demand made under division (A) of this 561
section and refuses to comply with that demand, a penalty of 562
five hundred dollars shall be imposed upon the person or public 563
utility for each day the person or public utility refuses to 564
comply with the demand. Penalties imposed under this division 565
may be assessed and collected in the same manner as assessments 566
made under Chapter 3769., 4305., 5727., 5728., 5733., 5735., 567
5736., 5739., 5743., 5745., 5747., 5749., 5751., or 5753., or 568
5755., or sections 718.90, 3734.90 to 3734.9014, of the Revised 569
Code. 570
Sec. 5703.263. (A)(1) "Tax return preparer" means any 571
person other than an accountant or an attorney that operates a 572
business that prepares, or directly or indirectly employs 573
another person to prepare, for a taxpayer a tax return or 574
application for refund in exchange for compensation or 575
remuneration from the taxpayer or the taxpayer's related member. 576
The preparation of a substantial portion of a tax return or 577
application for refund shall be considered to be the same as the 578
preparation of the return or application for refund. "Tax return 579
preparer" does not include an individual who performs only one 580
or more of the following activities: 581
(a) Furnishes typing, reproducing, or other mechanical 582
assistance; 583
(b) Prepares an application for refund or a return on 584

S. B. No. 28 Page 21
As Introduced
behalf of an employer by whom the individual is regularly and 585
continuously employed, or on behalf of an officer or employee of 586
that employer; 587
(c) Prepares as a fiduciary an application for refund or a 588
return; 589
(d) Prepares an application for refund or a return for a 590
taxpayer in response to a notice of deficiency issued to the 591
taxpayer or the taxpayer's related member, or in response to a 592
waiver of restriction after the commencement of an audit of the 593
taxpayer or the taxpayer's related member. 594
(2) "Related member" has the same meaning as in section 595
5733.042 of the Revised Code. 596
(3) "Accountant" means any of the following: 597
(a) An individual who holds both a CPA certificate and an 598
Ohio permit or Ohio registration issued by the accountancy board 599
under section 4701.10 of the Revised Code; 600
(b) An individual who holds a foreign certificate; 601
(c) An individual who is employed by a public accounting 602
firm with respect to any return prepared under the supervision 603
of an individual described in division (A)(3)(a) or (b) of this 604
section, regardless of whether the public accounting firm is 605
required to register with the accountancy board under section 606
4701.04 of the Revised Code. 607
(4) "CPA certificate" and "foreign certificate" have the 608
same meanings as in section 4701.01 of the Revised Code. 609
(5) "Attorney" means an individual who has been admitted 610
to the bar by order of the supreme court in compliance with its 611
prescribed and published rules, is permitted to practice as an 612

S. B. No. 28 Page 22
As Introduced
attorney and counselor at law in this state under Chapter 4705. 613
of the Revised Code, and is not currently suspended or removed 614
from such practice under that chapter. 615
(6) A tax return preparer engages in "prohibited conduct" 616
if the preparer does any of the following: 617
(a) Prepares any return or application for refund that 618
includes an understatement of a taxpayer's tax liability due to 619
an unreasonable position or due to willful or reckless conduct. 620
For the purposes of this division, "unreasonable position" and 621
"willful or reckless conduct" have the meanings as used in 622
section 6694 of the Internal Revenue Code. 623
(b) When required under any provision of Title LVII of the 624
Revised Code, the preparer fails to do any of the following: 625
(i) Provide copies of a return or application for refund; 626
(ii) Provide the preparer's signature or federal preparer 627
tax identification number on a return or application for refund; 628
(iii) Retain copies of the preparer's records; 629
(iv) Provide any information or documents requested by the 630
tax commissioner; 631
(v) Act diligently in determining a taxpayer's eligibility 632
for tax credits, deductions, or exemptions. 633
(c) Negotiates a check or other negotiable instrument 634
issued to a taxpayer by the department of taxation without the 635
permission of the taxpayer; 636
(d) Engages in any conduct subject to criminal penalties 637
under Title LVII of the Revised Code; 638
(e) Misrepresents the preparer's eligibility to file 639

S. B. No. 28 Page 23
As Introduced
returns or applications for refund on behalf of taxpayers, or 640
otherwise misrepresents the preparer's experience or education; 641
(f) Guarantees the payment of any tax refund or the 642
allowance of any tax credit, deduction, or exemption; 643
(g) Engages in any other fraudulent or deceptive conduct 644
that substantially interferes with the proper administration of 645
any provision of Title LVII of the Revised Code. 646
(7) "State" means a state of the United States, the 647
District of Columbia, the commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any 648
territory or possession of the United States. 649
(B) When a tax return preparer engages in prohibited 650
conduct, the commissioner, may do either or both of the 651
following: 652
(1) If the commissioner has previously warned the tax 653
return preparer in writing of the consequences of continuing to 654
engage in prohibited conduct, impose a penalty not exceeding one 655
hundred dollars per instance of prohibited conduct; 656
(2) Regardless of whether the commissioner has previously 657
warned the tax return preparer, request that the attorney 658
general apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for an 659
injunction to restrain the preparer from further engaging in the 660
prohibited conduct. The court may take either of the following 661
actions: 662
(a) If the court finds that injunctive relief is 663
appropriate to prevent the recurrence of the prohibited conduct, 664
the court shall issue an injunction against the preparer 665
enjoining the preparer from engaging in such conduct. 666
(b) If the court finds that the preparer has continually 667

S. B. No. 28 Page 24
As Introduced
or repeatedly engaged in prohibited conduct, and that enjoining 668
the preparer solely from engaging in such conduct would not be 669
sufficient to prevent the preparer's interference with the 670
proper administration of any provision of Title LVII of the 671
Revised Code, the court may issue an injunction against the 672
preparer enjoining the preparer from acting as a tax return 673
preparer in this state. 674
If a tax return preparer has been enjoined from preparing 675
tax returns or applications for refunds by a federal court or by 676
another state court in the five years preceding the date on 677
which an injunction is requested under this section, that prior 678
injunction shall be sufficient to establish a prima facie case 679
for the issuance of an injunction under division (B)(2) of this 680
section. 681
(C) The commissioner may require a tax return preparer to 682
include the preparer's name and federal preparer tax 683
identification number when filing any return or application for 684
refund. If a tax return preparer fails to include this 685
information when required to do so by the commissioner, or if 686
the information provided is false, inaccurate, or incomplete, 687
the commissioner may impose a penalty of fifty dollars for each 688
such failure, provided that the maximum penalty imposed on a 689
preparer under this division in a calendar year shall not exceed 690
twenty-five thousand dollars. 691
(D) The penalties imposed under divisions (B)(1) and (C) 692
of this section may be assessed and collected in the same manner 693
as assessments made under Chapter 3769., 4305., 5727., 5728., 694
5733., 5735., 5736., 5739., 5743., 5745., 5747., 5749., 5751., 695
or 5753., or 5755., section 718.90, or sections 3734.90 to 696
3734.9014 of the Revised Code. The commissioner may abate all or 697

S. B. No. 28 Page 25
As Introduced
a portion of any penalty imposed under this section upon the 698
showing of good cause by the tax return preparer. 699
Sec. 5703.50. As used in sections 5703.50 to 5703.53 of 700
the Revised Code: 701
(A) "Tax" includes only those taxes imposed on tangible 702
personal property listed in accordance with Chapter 5711. of the 703
Revised Code, taxes imposed under Chapters 5733., 5736., 5739., 704
5741., 5747., and 5751., and 5755. of the Revised Code, and the 705
tax administered under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised 706
Code. 707
(B) "Taxpayer" means a person subject to or potentially 708
subject to a tax including an employer required to deduct and 709
withhold any amount under section 5747.06 of the Revised Code. 710
(C) "Audit" means the examination of a taxpayer or the 711
inspection of the books, records, memoranda, or accounts of a 712
taxpayer for the purpose of determining liability for a tax. 713
(D) "Assessment" means a notice of underpayment or 714
nonpayment of a tax issued pursuant to section 718.90, 5711.26, 715
5711.32, 5733.11, 5736.09, 5739.13, 5741.11, 5741.13, 5747.13, 716
or 5751.09, or 5755.06 of the Revised Code. 717
(E) "County auditor" means the auditor of the county in 718
which the tangible personal property subject to a tax is 719
located. 720
Sec. 5703.70. (A) On the filing of an application for 721
refund under section 718.91, 3734.905, 4307.05, 4307.07, 722
5726.30, 5727.28, 5727.91, 5728.061, 5733.12, 5735.122, 5735.13, 723
5735.14, 5735.141, 5735.142, 5735.18, 5736.08, 5739.07, 724
5739.071, 5739.104, 5741.10, 5743.05, 5743.53, 5747.11, 5749.08, 725
5751.08, or 5753.06, 5755.05 of the Revised Code, or an 726

S. B. No. 28 Page 26
As Introduced
application for compensation under section 5739.061 of the 727
Revised Code, if the tax commissioner determines that the amount 728
of the refund or compensation to which the applicant is entitled 729
is less than the amount claimed in the application, the 730
commissioner shall give the applicant written notice by ordinary 731
mail of the amount. The notice shall be sent to the address 732
shown on the application unless the applicant notifies the 733
commissioner of a different address. The applicant shall have 734
sixty days from the date the commissioner mails the notice to 735
provide additional information to the commissioner or request a 736
hearing, or both. 737
(B) If the applicant neither requests a hearing nor 738
provides additional information to the tax commissioner within 739
the time prescribed by division (A) of this section, the 740
commissioner shall take no further action, and the refund or 741
compensation amount denied becomes final. 742
(C)(1) If the applicant requests a hearing within the time 743
prescribed by division (A) of this section, the tax commissioner 744
shall assign a time and place for the hearing and notify the 745
applicant of such time and place, but the commissioner may 746
continue the hearing from time to time, as necessary. After the 747
hearing, the commissioner may make such adjustments to the 748
refund or compensation as the commissioner finds proper, and 749
shall issue a final determination thereon. 750
(2) If the applicant does not request a hearing, but 751
provides additional information, within the time prescribed by 752
division (A) of this section, the commissioner shall review the 753
information, make such adjustments to the refund or compensation 754
as the commissioner finds proper, and issue a final 755
determination thereon. The commissioner may review such 756

S. B. No. 28 Page 27
As Introduced
information and make such adjustments as many times as the 757
commissioner finds proper before the issuance of a final 758
determination. 759
(3) If the applicant requests a hearing and provides 760
additional information within the time prescribed by division 761
(A) of this section, the commissioner may review the information 762
and make such adjustments to the refund or compensation as the 763
commissioner finds proper. The commissioner may review such 764
information and make such adjustments as many times as the 765
commissioner finds proper before the issuance of a final 766
determination. 767
The commissioner shall assign a time and place for the 768
hearing and notify the applicant of such time and place, but the 769
commissioner may continue the hearing from time to time, as 770
necessary. After the hearing, the commissioner may make any 771
additional adjustments to the refund or compensation as the 772
commissioner finds proper and shall issue a final determination 773
thereon. 774
(4) The commissioner shall serve a copy of the final 775
determination made under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this 776
section on the applicant in the manner provided in section 777
5703.37 of the Revised Code, and the decision is final, subject 778
to appeal under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. 779
(D) The tax commissioner shall certify to the director of 780
budget and management and treasurer of state for payment from 781
the tax refund fund created by section 5703.052 of the Revised 782
Code, the amount of the refund to be refunded under division (B) 783
or (C) of this section. The commissioner also shall certify to 784
the director and treasurer of state for payment from the general 785
revenue fund the amount of compensation to be paid under 786

S. B. No. 28 Page 28
As Introduced
division (B) or (C) of this section. 787
Sec. 5703.77. (A) As used in this section: 788
(1) "Taxpayer" means a person subject to or previously 789
subject to a tax or fee, a person that remits a tax or fee, or a 790
person required to or previously required to withhold or collect 791
and remit a tax or fee on behalf of another person. 792
(2) "Tax or fee" means a tax or fee administered by the 793
tax commissioner. 794
(3) "Credit account balance" means the amount that a 795
taxpayer remits to the state in excess of the amount required to 796
be remitted, after accounting for factors applicable to the 797
taxpayer such as accelerated payments, estimated payments, tax 798
credits, and tax credit balances that may be carried forward. 799
(4) "Tax debt" means an unpaid tax or fee or any unpaid 800
penalty, interest, or additional charge on such a tax or fee due 801
the state. 802
(B) As soon as practicable, but not later than sixty days 803
before the expiration of the period of time during which a 804
taxpayer may file a refund application for a tax or fee, the tax 805
commissioner shall review the taxpayer's accounts for the tax or 806
fee and notify the taxpayer of any credit account balance for 807
which the commissioner is required to issue a refund if the 808
taxpayer were to file a refund application for that balance, 809
regardless of whether the taxpayer files a refund application or 810
amended return with respect to that tax or fee. The notice shall 811
be made using contact information for the taxpayer on file with 812
the commissioner. 813
(C) Notwithstanding sections 128.47, 718.91, 3734.905, 814
4307.05, 5726.30, 5727.28, 5727.42, 5727.91, 5728.061, 5735.122, 815

S. B. No. 28 Page 29
As Introduced
5736.08, 5739.07, 5739.104, 5741.10, 5743.05, 5743.53, 5747.11, 816
5749.08, 5751.08, 5753.06, 5755.05, and any other section of the 817
Revised Code governing refunds, the commissioner may apply the 818
amount of any credit account balance for which the commissioner 819
is required to issue a refund if the taxpayer were to file a 820
refund application for that balance as a credit against the 821
taxpayer's liability for the tax or fee in the taxpayer's next 822
reporting period for that tax or fee or issue a refund of that 823
credit account balance to the taxpayer, subject to division (D) 824
of this section. 825
(D) Before issuing a refund to a taxpayer under division 826
(C) of this section, the tax commissioner shall withhold from 827
that refund the amount of any of the taxpayer's tax debt 828
certified to the attorney general under section 131.02 of the 829
Revised Code and the amount of the taxpayer's liability, if any, 830
for a tax debt. The commissioner shall apply any amount withheld 831
first in satisfaction of the amount of the taxpayer's certified 832
tax debt and then in satisfaction of the taxpayer's liability. 833
If the credit account balance originates from the tax 834
administered under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised 835
Code, it may be applied only against the taxpayer's certified 836
tax debt or tax liability due under those sections. 837
(E) The tax commissioner may adopt rules to administer 838
this section. 839
Sec. 5703.90. If any tax administered by the tax 840
commissioner remains unpaid after the date the tax is due, the 841
commissioner may issue an assessment for the unpaid tax, and for 842
any related penalties and interest, against any person liable 843
for the amount due, including, but not limited to, a person that 844
is jointly and severally liable for the amount under Chapter 845

S. B. No. 28 Page 30
As Introduced
5726. or , 5751., or 5755. of the Revised Code, a partner liable 846
for the tax liability of a partnership, a director liable for 847
the tax liability of a dissolved corporation, or any other 848
person liable for the tax liability of another person under the 849
Revised Code. The commissioner shall issue the assessment in 850
accordance with any other provision of the Revised Code 851
applicable to assessments for the tax for which the person to be 852
assessed is liable. 853
Sec. 5725.26. The real estate of a financial institution 854
or dealer in intangibles shall be taxed in the place where it is 855
located, the same as the real estate of persons is taxed, but 856
the taxes provided for in Chapters 5725., 5726., 5733., and 857
5751., and 5755. of the Revised Code shall be in lieu of all 858
other taxes on the other property and assets of such institution 859
or dealer, except personal property taxable under Chapter 5711. 860
of the Revised Code and leased, or held for the purpose of 861
leasing, to others if the owner or lessor of the property 862
acquired it for the sole purpose of leasing it to others. 863
For reports required to be filed under section 5725.14 of 864
the Revised Code in 2003 and thereafter, nothing in this section 865
shall be construed to exempt the property of any dealer in 866
intangibles under section 5725.13 of the Revised Code from the 867
tax imposed under section 5707.03 of the Revised Code. 868
Sec. 5747.081. If any portion of a taxpayer's income or 869
loss reported on the annual return required by section 5747.08 870
of the Revised Code is attributable to ownership, by any person, 871
of a taxable house, as defined in section 5755.01 of the Revised 872
Code, located in this state, the taxpayer shall include on the 873
annual return on which such income or losses are reported the 874
parcel identification number of each such house and identify the 875

S. B. No. 28 Page 31
As Introduced
county in which the house is located. 876
Sec. 5751.051. (A) Not later than the tenth day of the 877
second month after the end of each calendar quarter, every 878
taxpayer shall file with the tax commissioner a tax return in 879
such form as the commissioner prescribes. The return shall 880
include, but is not limited to, the amount of the taxpayer's 881
taxable gross receipts for the calendar quarter and shall 882
indicate the amount of tax due under section 5751.03 of the 883
Revised Code for the calendar quarter. If any portion of a 884
taxpayer's taxable gross receipts is attributable to ownership, 885
by any person, of a taxable house, as defined in section 5755.01 886
of the Revised Code, located in this state, the return shall 887
include the parcel identification number of each such house and 888
identify the county in which the house is located. 889
(B)(1) Subject to division (B) of section 5751.05 of the 890
Revised Code, a taxpayer shall report the taxable gross receipts 891
for that calendar quarter. 892
(2) With respect to taxable gross receipts incorrectly 893
reported in a calendar quarter that has a lower tax rate, the 894
tax shall be computed at the tax rate in effect for the 895
quarterly return in which such receipts should have been 896
reported. Nothing in division (B)(2) of this section prohibits a 897
taxpayer from filing an application for refund under section 898
5751.08 of the Revised Code with regard to the incorrect 899
reporting of taxable gross receipts discovered after filing the 900
annual return described in division (C) of this section. 901
A tax return shall not be deemed to be an incorrect 902
reporting of taxable gross receipts for the purposes of division 903
(B)(2) of this section if the return reflects between ninety- 904
five and one hundred five per cent of the actual taxable gross 905

S. B. No. 28 Page 32
As Introduced
receipts for the calendar quarter. 906
(C) For the purposes of division (B)(2) of this section, 907
the tax return filed for the fourth calendar quarter of a 908
calendar year is the annual return for the privilege tax imposed 909
by this chapter. Such return shall report any additional taxable 910
gross receipts not previously reported in the calendar year and 911
shall adjust for any over-reported taxable gross receipts in the 912
calendar year. If the taxpayer ceases to be a taxpayer before 913
the end of the calendar year, the last return the taxpayer is 914
required to file shall be the annual return for the taxpayer and 915
the taxpayer shall report any additional taxable gross receipts 916
not previously reported in the calendar year and shall adjust 917
for any over-reported taxable gross receipts in the calendar 918
year. 919
(D) Because the tax imposed by this chapter is a privilege 920
tax, the tax rate with respect to taxable gross receipts for a 921
calendar quarter is not fixed until the end of the measurement 922
period for each calendar quarter. Subject to division (B)(2) of 923
this section, the total amount of taxable gross receipts 924
reported for a given calendar quarter shall be subject to the 925
tax rate in effect in that quarter. 926
Sec. 5755.01. As used in this chapter : 927
(A) "Taxable house" means a single-family, two-family, or 928
three-family dwelling. 929
(B) "Person" means an individual, receiver, assignee, 930
trustee in bankruptcy, firm, company, joint-stock company, 931
business trust, estate, partnership, limited liability 932
partnership, limited liability company, association, joint 933
venture, club, society, for-profit corporation, S corporation, 934

S. B. No. 28 Page 33
As Introduced
qualified subchapter S subsidiary, qualified subchapter S trust, 935
trust, entity that is disregarded for federal income tax 936
purposes, and any other entity. 937
(C) "Combined taxpayer group" means a group of two or more 938
persons treated as a single taxpayer for purposes of this 939
chapter under section 5755.011 of the Revised Code. 940
(D) "Taxpayer" means any person or combined taxpayer group 941
subject to the tax levied under section 5755.02 of the Revised 942
Code. "Taxpayer" does not include an excluded person. 943
(E) "Excluded person" means any of the following: 944
(1) A county land reutilization corporation organized 945
under Chapter 1724. of the Revised Code; 946
(2) A port authority organized under Chapter 4582. of the 947
Revised Code; 948
(3) An organization described under section 501(c)(3) of 949
the Internal Revenue Code and exempt from federal income 950
taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. 951
(F) "Reporting person" means a person in a combined 952
taxpayer group that is designated by that group to legally bind 953
the group for all filings and tax liabilities and to receive all 954
legal notices with respect to matters under this chapter. 955
(G) "Tax period" means a calendar month. 956
Sec. 5755.011. (A) All persons, except an excluded person , 957
having more than fifty per cent of the value of their ownership 958
interest owned or controlled, directly or constructively through 959
related interests, by common owners during all or any portion of 960
the tax period, together with the common owners, shall be 961
members of a combined taxpayer group. 962

S. B. No. 28 Page 34
As Introduced
(B) A combined taxpayer group shall file returns and pay 963
taxes under this chapter as a single taxpayer. 964
(C) In the case of one or more persons formed under 965
Chapter 1706. of the Revised Code or under the laws of any state 966
or of the United States as a limited liability company and 967
series thereof, such limited liability company and any series 968
thereof, if owned or shared by the same holding company or that 969
have joint corporate or common control, shall file as a combined 970
taxpayer group for the tax period. 971
(D) All members of a combined taxpayer group during the 972
tax period or periods for which additional tax, penalty, or 973
interest is owed are jointly and severally liable for such 974
amounts. Although the reporting person will be assessed for the 975
liability, such amounts due may be collected by assessment 976
against any member of the group as provided in section 5703.90 977
of the Revised Code or pursued against any member of the group 978
when a liability is certified to the attorney general under 979
section 131.02 of the Revised Code. 980
Sec. 5755.02. For the purpose of funding the needs of thi s 981
state and its local governments, there is hereby levied a 982
housing market impact tax on each person or combined taxpayer 983
group owning fifty or more taxable houses in any county. The tax 984
levied under this section shall equal two thousand dollars for 985
each taxable house owned on the first day of each tax period. 986
To the extent a county auditor is aware of a person's 987
liability for the tax levied under this section due to ownership 988
of the requisite number of taxable houses in the county, the 989
auditor shall notify the person on such a person's tax bill 990
prepared and mailed or delivered under section 323.13 of the 991
Revised Code that the person may be subject to the tax levied 992

S. B. No. 28 Page 35
As Introduced
under this section. 993
Sec. 5755.03. (A) A taxpayer or, in the case of a combine d 994
taxpayer group, the reporting person, on or before the twenty- 995
first day of each month, shall make and file a return for the 996
preceding tax period on a form prescribed by the tax 997
commissioner and shall pay the tax shown on the return to be 998
due. If required by the tax commissioner, a taxpayer shall file 999
the tax return electronically. The commissioner may require 1000
taxpayers to use the Ohio business gateway as defined in section 1001
718.01 of the Revised Code to file returns and remit the tax, or 1002
may provide another means for taxpayers to file and remit the 1003
tax electronically. 1004
(B) A person required by this section to remit taxes or 1005
file returns electronically may apply to the commissioner, on a 1006
form prescribed by the commissioner, to be excused from that 1007
requirement. The commissioner may excuse a person from that 1008
requirement for good cause. 1009
(C)(1) The housing market impact tax revenue fund is 1010
hereby created in the state treasury, which shall consist of all 1011
money collected from the tax levied under section 5755.02 of the 1012
Revised Code. 1013
(2) From the housing market impact tax revenue fund the 1014
director of budget and management shall transfer as needed to 1015
the tax refund fund amounts equal to the refunds certified by 1016
the tax commissioner under section 5755.05 of the Revised Code 1017
and attributable to the tax levied under section 5755.02 of the 1018
Revised Code. 1019
(3) After making any transfers required by division (C)(2) 1020
of this section, but not later than the twenty-eighth day of 1021

S. B. No. 28 Page 36
As Introduced
each month, the director of budget and management shall transfer 1022
fifty per cent of the balance of the housing market impact tax 1023
revenue fund tax fund to the low- and moderate-income housing 1024
trust fund created under section 174.02 of the Revised Code and 1025
the remaining fifty per cent to the local government fund. 1026
Sec. 5755.04. (A)(1) A taxpayer who fails to file a retur n 1027
or pay the full amount of the tax due within the period 1028
prescribed under this chapter shall pay a penalty in an amount 1029
not exceeding the product of: 1030
(a) Five per cent of the median Ohio home price as listed 1031
in the American community survey published by the United States 1032
census bureau applicable to the last year for which such data is 1033
published; 1034
(b) The number of taxable houses owned by the taxpayer on 1035
the first day of the tax period to which the return applies. 1036
(2) The penalty imposed under division (A)(1) of this 1037
section is in addition to any other penalty imposed under this 1038
chapter. A penalty may be collected by assessment in the manner 1039
prescribed by section 5755.06 of the Revised Code. The tax 1040
commissioner may abate all or a portion of such a penalty. 1041
(B) If the tax due under section 5755.02 of the Revised 1042
Code is not timely paid, the taxpayer shall pay interest at the 1043
rate per annum prescribed in section 5703.47 of the Revised Code 1044
beginning on the day the tax was due through the day the tax is 1045
paid or an assessment is issued, whichever occurs first. 1046
(C) The tax commissioner shall collect any penalty or 1047
interest as if it were the tax levied by section 5755.02 of the 1048
Revised Code. Penalties and interest shall be credited as if it 1049
was revenue arising from the applicable tax. 1050

S. B. No. 28 Page 37
As Introduced
Sec. 5755.05. (A) A taxpayer may apply to the tax 1051
commissioner for a refund of any amount imposed under this 1052
chapter that was overpaid, paid illegally or erroneously, or 1053
paid on an illegal or erroneous assessment. The application 1054
shall be on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner. The 1055
taxpayer shall provide the amount of the requested refund along 1056
with the claimed reasons for, and documentation to support, the 1057
issuance of a refund. The taxpayer shall file the application 1058
with the tax commissioner within four years after the date the 1059
payment was made unless the applicant has waived the time 1060
limitation under division (D) of section 5755.06 of the Revised 1061
Code. In the latter event, the four-year limitation is extended 1062
for the same period of time as the waiver. 1063
(B) Upon the filing of a refund application, the tax 1064
commissioner shall determine the amount of refund to which the 1065
applicant is entitled. If the amount is greater than that 1066
claimed, the tax commissioner shall certify the amount to the 1067
director of budget and management and treasurer of state for 1068
payment from the tax refund fund. If the amount is less than 1069
that claimed, the tax commissioner shall proceed under section 1070
5703.70 of the Revised Code. 1071
(C) Interest on a refund applied for under this section, 1072
computed at the rate provided for in section 5703.47 of the 1073
Revised Code, shall be allowed from the later of the date the 1074
payment was due or the date payment was made. Except as provided 1075
in section 5755.06 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner 1076
may, with the consent of the taxpayer, provide for crediting 1077
against the tax due for a tax period, the amount of any refund 1078
due the taxpayer for a preceding tax period. 1079
Sec. 5755.051. As used in this section, "debt to the 1080

S. B. No. 28 Page 38
As Introduced
state" means unpaid taxes that are due the state, unpaid 1081
workers' compensation premiums that are due, unpaid unemployment 1082
compensation contributions that are due, unpaid unemployment 1083
compensation payments in lieu of contributions that are due, 1084
unpaid fees payable to the state or to the clerk of courts under 1085
section 4505.06 of the Revised Code, incorrect medical 1086
assistance payments, or any unpaid charge, penalty, or interest 1087
arising from any of the foregoing. A debt to the state is not a 1088
"debt to the state" as used in this section unless the liability 1089
underlying the debt to the state has become incontestable 1090
because the time for appealing, reconsidering, reassessing, or 1091
otherwise questioning the liability has expired or the liability 1092
has been finally determined to be valid. 1093
If a taxpayer who is entitled to a refund under section 1094
5755.05 of the Revised Code owes a debt to the state, the amount 1095
refundable may be applied in satisfaction of the debt to the 1096
state. If the amount refundable is less than the amount of the 1097
debt to the state, the amount refundable may be applied in 1098
partial satisfaction of the debt. If the amount refundable is 1099
greater than the amount of the debt, the amount refundable 1100
remaining after satisfaction of the debt shall be refunded to 1101
the taxpayer. 1102
Sec. 5755.052. No person shall knowingly make, present, 1103
aid, or assist in the preparation or presentation of a false or 1104
fraudulent report, return, schedule, statement, claim, or 1105
document authorized or required by law to be filed with the 1106
department of taxation, the treasurer of state, a county 1107
auditor, a county treasurer, or a county clerk of courts, or 1108
knowingly procure, counsel, or advise the preparation or 1109
presentation of such report, return, schedule, statement, claim, 1110
or document, or knowingly change, alter, or amend, or knowingly 1111

S. B. No. 28 Page 39
As Introduced
procure, counsel, or advise such change, alteration, or 1112
amendment of the records upon which such report, return, 1113
schedule, statement, claim, or document is based with intent to 1114
defraud the state or any of its subdivisions. With respect to 1115
such acts or conduct, no conviction shall be had under any other 1116
section of the Revised Code. 1117
Sec. 5755.06. (A)(1) The tax commissioner may issue an 1118
assessment, based on any information in the commissioner's 1119
possession, against a taxpayer who fails to pay any tax levied 1120
under section 5755.02 of the Revised Code or to file a return 1121
under section 5755.03 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner 1122
shall give the taxpayer written notice of the assessment under 1123
section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the tax 1124
commissioner shall include instructions on how to petition for 1125
reassessment and on how to request a hearing with respect to the 1126
petition. 1127
(2) Unless the taxpayer, within sixty days after service 1128
of the notice of assessment, files with the tax commissioner, 1129
either personally or by certified mail, a written petition 1130
signed by the taxpayer, or by the taxpayer's authorized agent 1131
who has knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final, 1132
and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the 1133
taxpayer to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate 1134
the taxpayer's objections to the assessment. Additional 1135
objections may be raised in writing if they are received by the 1136
tax commissioner before the date shown on the final 1137
determination. 1138
(3) If a petition for reassessment has been properly 1139
filed, the tax commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 1140
of the Revised Code. 1141

S. B. No. 28 Page 40
As Introduced
(4) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of 1142
the assessment, including penalties and accrued interest, 1143
remains unpaid, the tax commissioner may file a certified copy 1144
of the entry making the assessment final in the office of the 1145
clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county or in the 1146
office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of the county 1147
in which the taxpayer resides, or the taxpayer's principal place 1148
of business in this state is located. Immediately upon the 1149
filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the 1150
state against the taxpayer assessed in the amount shown on the 1151
entry. The judgment has the same effect as other judgments. 1152
Execution shall issue upon the judgment at the request of the 1153
tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution 1154
apply to sales made under the judgment. 1155
(5) If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within 1156
sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion 1157
of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at 1158
the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised 1159
Code from the day the tax commissioner issued the assessment 1160
until the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the 1161
attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the 1162
Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of 1163
the assessment is certified to the attorney general for 1164
collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall 1165
bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 1166
5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until 1167
the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in 1168
the same manner as the tax levied under section 5755.02 of the 1169
Revised Code and may be collected by the issuance of an 1170
assessment under this section. 1171
(B) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of 1172

S. B. No. 28 Page 41
As Introduced
the tax levied under section 5755.02 of the Revised Code will be 1173
jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection 1174
of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may 1175
issue a jeopardy assessment against the taxpayer that is liable 1176
for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of a jeopardy 1177
assessment, the tax commissioner shall file an entry with the 1178
clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by 1179
division (A)(4) of this section, and the clerk shall proceed as 1180
directed in that division. Notice of the jeopardy assessment 1181
shall be served on the taxpayer or the taxpayer's authorized 1182
agent under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code within five days 1183
after the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount 1184
assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the taxpayer 1185
assessed files a petition for reassessment under division (A)(2) 1186
of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to 1187
the tax commissioner that is in an amount sufficient to satisfy 1188
the unpaid balance of the assessment. If a petition for 1189
reassessment has been filed, and if satisfactory security has 1190
been provided, the tax commissioner shall proceed under division 1191
(A)(3) of this section. Full or partial payment of the 1192
assessment does not prejudice the tax commissioner's 1193
consideration of the petition for reassessment. 1194
(C) The tax commissioner shall immediately forward to the 1195
treasurer of state all amounts the tax commissioner receives 1196
under this section, and the amounts forwarded shall be treated 1197
as if they were revenue arising from the tax levied under 1198
section 5755.02 of the Revised Code. 1199
(D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, no 1200
assessment shall be issued against a taxpayer for the tax levied 1201
under section 5755.02 of the Revised Code more than four years 1202
after the due date for filing the return for the tax period for 1203

S. B. No. 28 Page 42
As Introduced
which the tax was reported, or more than four years after the 1204
return for the tax period was filed, whichever is later. This 1205
division does not bar an assessment against a taxpayer who fails 1206
to file a return as required by section 5755.03 of the Revised 1207
Code or who files a fraudulent return, or when the taxpayer and 1208
the tax commissioner waive in writing the time limitation. 1209
(E) If the whereabouts of a person subject to this chapter 1210
is not known to the tax commissioner, the commissioner shall 1211
follow the procedures under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. 1212
Sec. 5755.07. The tax commissioner shall administer and 1213
enforce this chapter. In addition to any other powers conferred 1214
upon the tax commissioner by law, the tax commissioner may do 1215
any of the following: 1216
(A) Prescribe all forms that are required to be filed 1217
under this chapter; 1218
(B) Appoint professional, technical, and clerical 1219
employees as are necessary to carry out the tax commissioner's 1220
duties under this chapter; 1221
(C) Adopt rules that are necessary and proper to carry out 1222
this chapter. 1223
Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 1224
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 1225
in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 1226
121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 1227
Sec. 5755.99. (A) Whoever violates section 5755.052 of th e 1228
Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree and the 1229
court may impose upon the offender an additional fine of not 1230
more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars. 1231

S. B. No. 28 Page 43
As Introduced
(B) The penalties authorized in this section are in 1232
addition to any penalties imposed by the tax commissioner under 1233
section 5755.04 of the Revised Code. 1234
Section 2. That existing sections 131.02, 319.202, 1235
715.013, 4303.26, 5703.052, 5703.053, 5703.19, 5703.263, 1236
5703.50, 5703.70, 5703.77, 5703.90, 5725.26, and 5751.051 of the 1237
Revised Code are hereby repealed. 1238
Section 3. Within twelve months after the effective date 1239
of this section, a pass-through entity, as defined in section 1240
5733.04 of the Revised Code, that owns a taxable house, as 1241
defined in section 5755.01 of the Revised Code, shall file a 1242
statement with the county auditor of the county in which the 1243
taxable house is located that includes both of the following: 1244
(A) The name, address, telephone number, and electronic 1245
mail address of the entity and an owner, member, manager, 1246
officer, partner, or associate, as applicable, of the entity; 1247
(B) The address and parcel identification number of the 1248
taxable house or houses owned by the entity. 1249
Section 4. The tax levied under section 5755.02 of the 1250
Revised Code, as enacted by this act, applies on and after the 1251
first day of January following the effective date of this 1252
section. 1253